Illinois, session 104th, HB3105.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Division 7 to Article 18 and by changing Section 20-15 as 6follows: 7    (35 ILCS 200/Art. 18 Div. 7 heading new)8Division 7. School District Extension Freeze Law 9    (35 ILCS 200/18-280 new)10    Sec. 18-280. Short title. This Division 7 may be cited as 11the School District Extension Freeze Law. 12    (35 ILCS 200/18-285 new)13    Sec. 18-285. Limitation. 14    (a) If, at the end of any levy year, any school district 15has reserves of 50% or more of its operating budget, as 16determined by the State Board of Education, then, for the next 17levy year, the county clerk shall extend a rate for that 18district for all purposes that is no greater than the 19educational limiting rate.20    (b) Each school district shall transmit to the State Board 21of Education any information required by the State Board of   HB3105- 2 -LRB104 11454 HLH 21542 b1Education, by rule, for the purposes of making the 2determination required under this Section. 3    (c) In the case of a school district that is subject to 4both the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law and this Law, 5the provisions of the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law 6shall be suspended for that district for any levy year in which 7the district is subject to the educational limiting rate under 8this Division. 9    (d) For a school district that has reserves of 50% or more 10but not more than 60% of its operating budget at the end of the 11immediately preceding levy year, as determined by the State 12Board of Education, "educational limiting rate" means a 13fraction the numerator of which is the district's last 14preceding extension for all purposes and the denominator of 15which is the current year's equalized assessed value of all 16real property in the territory under the jurisdiction of the 17district during the prior levy year. For a school district 18that has reserves of 60% or more of its operating budget at the 19end of the immediately preceding levy year, as determined by 20the State Board of Education, "educational limiting rate" 21means a fraction (i) the numerator of which is the district's 22last preceding extension for all purposes minus the difference 23between the district's reserve amount for the immediately 24preceding levy year and a reserve amount of 60% for that levy 25year and (ii) the denominator of which is the current year's 26equalized assessed value of all real property in the territory   HB3105- 3 -LRB104 11454 HLH 21542 b1under the jurisdiction of the taxing district during the prior 2levy year. In either case, the denominator shall not include 3new property or the recovered tax increment value, as defined 4in the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law.  5    (35 ILCS 200/18-290 new)6    Sec. 18-290. Referendum to increase the educational 7limiting rate. A school district may increase its educational 8limiting rate for one or more levy years if the district holds 9a referendum before the levy date for the first levy year at 10which a majority of voters voting on the issue approves the 11higher educational limiting rate. Referenda shall be conducted 12at a regularly scheduled election in accordance with the 13Election Code. The question shall be presented in 14substantially the following manner:15        Shall the educational limiting rate for (school 16    district) be increased from (applicable educational 17    limiting rate) to (insert proposed educational limiting 18    rate) for (insert each levy year for which the increased 19    extension limitation will apply)? 20    The votes must be recorded as "Yes" or "No".21    If a majority of voters voting on the issue approves the 22adoption of the increase, the increase shall be applicable for 23each levy year specified.  24    (35 ILCS 200/20-15)  HB3105- 4 -LRB104 11454 HLH 21542 b1    Sec. 20-15. Information on bill or separate statement. 2There shall be printed on each bill, or on a separate slip 3which shall be mailed with the bill:4        (a) a statement itemizing the rate at which taxes have 5    been extended for each of the taxing districts in the 6    county in whose district the property is located, and in 7    those counties utilizing electronic data processing 8    equipment the dollar amount of tax due from the person 9    assessed allocable to each of those taxing districts, 10    including a separate statement of the dollar amount of tax 11    due which is allocable to a tax levied under the Illinois 12    Local Library Act or to any other tax levied by a 13    municipality or township for public library purposes,14        (b) a separate statement for each of the taxing 15    districts of the dollar amount of tax due which is 16    allocable to a tax levied under the Illinois Pension Code 17    or to any other tax levied by a municipality or township 18    for public pension or retirement purposes,19        (b-5) a list of each tax increment financing (TIF) 20    district in which the property is located and the dollar 21    amount of tax due that is allocable to the TIF district, 22        (c) the total tax rate,23        (d) the total amount of tax due, and24        (e) the amount by which the total tax and the tax 25    allocable to each taxing district differs from the 26    taxpayer's last prior tax bill, and .  HB3105- 5 -LRB104 11454 HLH 21542 b1    (f) if the property is located in a school district that 2had its extension reduced by operation of the School District 3Extension Freeze Law because it retained reserves of 60% or 4more at the end of the immediately preceding levy year, then a 5separate statement setting forth the amount by which the 6extension for educational purposes was reduced. 7    The county treasurer shall ensure that only those taxing 8districts in which a parcel of property is located shall be 9listed on the bill for that property.10    In all counties the statement shall also provide:11        (1) the property index number or other suitable 12    description,13        (2) the assessment of the property,14        (3) the statutory amount of each homestead exemption 15    applied to the property, 16        (4) the assessed value of the property after 17    application of all homestead exemptions, 18        (5) the equalization factors imposed by the county and 19    by the Department, and20        (6) the equalized assessment resulting from the 21    application of the equalization factors to the basic 22    assessment.23    In all counties which do not classify property for 24purposes of taxation, for property on which a single family 25residence is situated the statement shall also include a 26statement to reflect the fair cash value determined for the   HB3105- 6 -LRB104 11454 HLH 21542 b1property. In all counties which classify property for purposes 2of taxation in accordance with Section 4 of Article IX of the 3Illinois Constitution, for parcels of residential property in 4the lowest assessment classification the statement shall also 5include a statement to reflect the fair cash value determined 6for the property.7    In all counties, the statement must include information 8that certain taxpayers may be eligible for tax exemptions, 9abatements, and other assistance programs and that, for more 10information, taxpayers should consult with the office of their 11township or county assessor and with the Department of 12Revenue. For bills mailed on or after January 1, 2026, the 13statement must include, in bold face type, a list of 14exemptions available to taxpayers and contact information for 15the chief county assessment officer. 16    In counties which use the estimated or accelerated billing 17methods, these statements shall only be provided with the 18final installment of taxes due. The provisions of this Section 19create a mandatory statutory duty. They are not merely 20directory or discretionary. The failure or neglect of the 21collector to mail the bill, or the failure of the taxpayer to 22receive the bill, shall not affect the validity of any tax, or 23the liability for the payment of any tax.24(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 1-1-25.) 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 262025.